Hawaii, session 2025, GM1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the Center for
Cultural and Technical Interchange Between East and West Act of
1960, Public Law 86-472, authorized the establishment in Hawaii
of a center for cultural and technical interchange between East
and West, and Act 82, Session Laws of Hawaii 1975 (Act 82),
established an educational non-profit public corporation, the
Center for Cultural and Technical Interchange Between East and
West, Inc., better known and referred to as the "East-West
Center", to administer and operate the center. Act 82 specifies
the purposes of the East-West Center, which include, among other
things, the promotion of better relations and understanding
between the United States and the nations of the East through
the administration and operation of the East-West Center as an
educational institution operating in furtherance of the
objectives of Public Law 86-472 and the promotion, among the
nations of the East and West, of the use of the East-West Center
by qualified persons for cooperative study, training, and
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
research in matters of East-West significance, thus leading to
better relations and understanding as to such matters.
The legislature further finds that the East-West Center has
become a pivotal institution in fostering understanding and
cooperation between the United States and the nations of Asia
and the Pacific. Hawaii's unique geographical location and
multicultural heritage make it an ideal location for promoting
international relations, particularly within the Asia-Pacific
region. For over six decades, the East-West Center has
significantly contributed to the State's role as a bridge
between the East and West, enhancing the State's position in
international affairs.
The legislature further finds that the East-West center's
programs in research, education, and exchange have directly
benefited the State's economy, culture, and diplomatic
relations. While the federal government has provided
significant funding to the East-West center, this federal
support has fluctuated over the years. The legislature
recognizes that the center would benefit from regular,
predictable state resources to support the development of
programs and initiatives that align with the State's strategic
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 2

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
goals in international relations, education, and economic
development.
The legislature finds that the East-West center has served
and continues to serve a public purpose of promoting better
S relations and understanding between the United States and the
nations of the East and that granting authorization to the
East-West center to receive appropriations of state funds exempt
from the requirements of chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
complies with the public purpose requirement of article VII,
section 4, of the Hawaii State Constitution.
The legislature further finds that strong sister-state,
sister-school, and similar relationships benefit the State's
businesses and economy, improve access to flights and
transportation, expand high school and college student
educational exchanges, broaden access to Pacific culture and
arts, preserve the State's relationships to the places of origin
of its immigrant communities, and spur sub-national government
collaborations to address common priorities, including the
eradication of invasive species, promotion of economic
development, advancement of clean energy, and preservation of
peace between nations. Further, it is appropriate for the State
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
to explore and take advantage of additional ways that Hawaii can
benefit from international partnerships, including generating
revenue abroad similar to many other jurisdictions. For example,
hosting facilities abroad for local farmers and retailers to more
easily sell Hawaii products in key markets, or investing in
projects that generate a return, could create revenue to support
Hawaii programs and services without additional expense to local
taxpayers.
The legislature also finds that international relations
across the Pacific have been rapidly changing. Additionally,
previous generations of the State's key community, business, and
government leaders who have carefully fostered and maintained
these important relationships are retiring or passing on. In
order for residents to continue to benefit from the State's
international ties, and for Hawaii to take advantage of
international business and revenue opportunities abroad, as so
many other jurisdictions currently do, it is critical that the
State adjust its engagement strategy, ensure continuity with its
sister-state communities and partners, and plan for the future.
Therefore, the legislature finds that in celebration of the
fiftieth anniversary of the establishment of the East-West
2025-2881 SB1578 GDI SMA.docx z
wiinniHgiiHivHiinM

Page 5 S.B. NO.
sb’2
C.D. 1
center, the State must update its international engagement strategy
and reaffirm its commitment to building and maintaining the
international partnerships that have benefitted the State over
the years so they can continue to benefit local residents for
generations to come.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish the official designation of the East-West
center as the center for cultural and technical
interchange between East and West, Inc., and exempt
state fund appropriations to the East-West center from
chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes;
(2) Rename the Hawaii sister-state committee as the Hawaii
sister-state and international partnerships commission
and amends its functions and membership;
(3) Require the office of international affairs to provide
support to the Hawaii sister-state and international
partnerships commission;
(4) Expand the department of business, economic
development, and tourism's authority to establish
out-of-state offices to include out-of-state
facilities to support sister-state or province
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 5

Page 6 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
partnerships and other partnerships that promote and
enrich the people, cultures, environments, and
economies of the State and its international partners,
generate revenue for the State, and buy property; and
S (5) Appropriate funds.
SECTION 2. Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§201- East-West center. (a) The official designation
of the East-West center shall be the center for cultural and
technical interchange between East and West, Inc.
(b) The gualifying standards and conditions related to the
receipt of funds under chapter 42F shall not apply to funds
received by the East-West center, or center for cultural and
technical interchange between East and West, Inc.; provided that
if the center for cultural and technical interchange between
East and West, Inc, contracts with a recipient or provider, then
the gualifying standards, conditions, and other provisions of
chapter 42F shall apply to the recipient or provider and the
contract.
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 6

Page 7 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) To receive state funds, the center for cultural and
technical interchange between East and West, Inc., shall;
(1) Be licensed or accredited, in accordance with federal,
state, or county statutes, rules, or ordinances, to
conduct the activities or provide the services for
which state funds are appropriated;
(2) Comply with all applicable federal and state laws
prohibiting discrimination against any person on the
basis of race, color, national origin, religion,
creed, sex, age, sexual orientation, or disability;
(3) Agree not to use the funds for entertainment or
lobbying activities in the State;
(4) Be incorporated under the laws of the State;
(5) Have bylaws or policies that describe the manner in
which the activities or services for which funds are
appropriated shall be conducted or provided;
(6) Have been determined and designated to be a tax-exempt
organization by the Internal Revenue Service; and
(7) Have a governing board whose members shall have no
material conflict of interest and serve without
compensation.
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx ;
niMliHWIMHMHIi

Page 8
S.B. NO.
■ [J .J
C.D. 1
(d) The comptroller and state auditor may examine the use
of funds appropriated to the center for cultural and technical
interchange between East and West, Inc.
(e) The allocation of state support shall neither impinge
on the autonomy of the center for cultural and technical
interchange between East and West, Inc., nor imply state control
over its programs or policies, except as provided in this
section.
(f) The center for cultural and technical interchange
between East and West, Inc., shall submit a report to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session, which shall include an explanation of the
facility maintenance and other functions accomplished by state
fund expenditures in the previous fiscal year."
SECTION 3. Section 201-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The office shall:
(1) Develop policies that promote and strengthen relations
with other countries in the areas of international
business, economy, culture, and the arts;
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 8
wniiBiiniiniiHim

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Develop policies that promote transportation between,
and tourism with, other countries;
(3) Develop and promote international telecommunications
and high technology exchanges;
(4) Encourage the development of international sister-city
programs, pairing Hawaii cities with cities around the
globe for artistic, cultural, economic, educational,
and faith-based exchanges;
(5) Develop and promote Hawaii as the economic, trade,
commerce, transportation, banking, and tourism hub of
the Pacific;
(6) Develop an international affairs and peace education
curriculum that includes studies of international
affairs and peace initiatives and takes a proactive,
IS strategic approach to the development of policies that
promote the prevention of national and international
conflict, nonviolent intervention, mediation, peaceful
resolution of conflict, and structured mediation of
conflict; [a^id]
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx
liiiniiiiiiiHiiiiiiiiiinH

Page 10 S.B. NO.
^0’2
C.D. 1
(7) Provide for exchanges of individuals between Hawaii
and other nations to develop international and
peace-based initiatives[—]; and
(8) Provide support to the Hawaii sister-state and
international partnerships cominission. "
SECTION 4. Section 201-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§201-81 Establishment of out-of-state offices; purposes.
The department of business, economic development, and tourism
may establish and operate offices and facilities in out-of-state
locations, including foreign nations, to effectuate the
following purposes:
(1) Develop programs to reach targeted companies or
industries in the respective area and surrounding
regions;
(2) Monitor out-of-state government policies and
regulations that have an impact on business, markets,
sales, tourism, and related activities;
(3) Host government and business officials at conferences,
meetings and social occasions, or other events on
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx

iiiiiiHHimniniHiiHii

Page 11 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
matters pertaining to business opportunities and
attraction of investments for the State;
(4) Develop and conduct advertising efforts, promotional
events, media coverage, and educational programs
regarding commerce in the State; [aftd]
(5) Conduct related operations as needed, [such—as]
including hiring or contracting for consultants[—]£
(6) Support sister-state or province relationships, as
defined in section 229-1, and other partnerships that
promote and enrich the people, cultures, environments,
and economies of the State and its international
partners; and
(7) Generate revenue for the State."
SECTION 5. Section 201-82, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§201-82 Powers of the department. The department,
subject to the approval of the director of budget and finance,
shall have the following general powers to operate out-of-state
offices and facilities established:
(1) To enter into contracts, leases, or cooperative
agreements, or perform other transactions with any
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 11
iiiHiniifliiiniiinii

Page 12 SB. NO 1578
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
person, firm, partnership, association, company,
corporation, or foreign nation, as may be necessary in
the conduct of its business and on [such] any terms as
the department may deem appropriate, using competitive
procurement practices, to the extent practicable, in
accordance with rules adopted by the policy board;
(2) To establish operational bank accounts in out-of-state
locations, including foreign denomination accounts, as
may be necessary in the conduct of its business,
notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 38;
(3) To receive by gifts, grants, devises, bequests, or
otherwise from private sources or a foreign nation,
any property, real, personal, or mixed, intangible or
tangible, absolutely or in trust, to be used and
disposed of, either the principal or the income
therefrom, in accordance with the conditions under
which it was received;
(4) To buy, sell, lease, rent, hold, maintain, use, and
operate any property, real, personal, or mixed,
tangible or intangible, in accordance with the
conditions under which it was received;
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 12

Page 13 S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(5) To hire such personnel as may be necessary in the
conduct of its business and on [ouch] a^ terms as the
department may deem appropriate; and
(6) To do any or all other acts reasonably necessary to
carry out the objects and purposes of this part,
provided that the department shall not obligate any
funds of the State not appropriated to the
department."
SECTION 6. Section 229-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-Fl§229-1 [^-] [Definition-T] Definitions. For the purposes
of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires [7-
"oiotor-otatG]£
"Commission" means the Hawaii sister-state and
IS international partnerships commission established under section
229-2.
"Sister-state or province [relationship"] partnership"
means a [-reiatiensfeip] partnership between the State of Hawaii
and the state or province or similar governmental or political
subdivision of a foreign nation."
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 13

Page 14 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 7. Section 229-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t]§229-2 [-3-] Hawaii sister-state [e^raaitfeee] and
international partnerships commission. [-{-M-H-- Thore—shall bo
established the Hawaii -s-is-tor-otato committee,—to bo placed
within- the department of buoinoso,—eeen^ftie—deveiepmeft^fe-j—and
tourism for administrative purpeoos only,—consisting of five
members appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34.
The purpose- of tho-committcc shall bo to advise t-hc
governor and the legislature on matters relating to sistor-stato
er^^revifiee—reietiens—aftd—reietieesT—in general,—between the
•SPefee—aftd-^fei^e-^etetes—ef^-previeees—ef—^ereign—eeuftt-ries-r
[ (b) ]-- The govorner shal-l appe-int five members,—one—member
from each of five lists -of nominees submitted respectively by
the follewing:-
- HH- Speaker of the house of ropresontati-vos;
- (-3-)- President of the senate;
Native-Hawaiian cultural organization;
- (-4-)- Ba-sb—West—Genber;—and
Hawaii State Association of—€ounbies-r
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 14

Page 15 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
A ehair and-vice chair of tho eenunittoc ohall bo-appoint-ed
by the committoo-momboEa- from among t-hcmsolvcs-;-- Momboro shali
servo-wit-hout componsation but ohall bo roimburaod for-cxpon&e-s-r
including travel oxponoco,—aoeesaa-Fy—perfermaftee—of-
their dutioo.]
(a) There is established within the department of
business, economic development, and tourism, for administrative
purposes only, the Hawaii sister-state and international
partnerships commission.
(b) The commission shall support the governor,
legislature, and office of international affairs in building and
maintaining strategic long-term sister-state or province
partnerships that promote and enrich the people, cultures,
environments, and economies of the State and its international
partners.
(c) The commission shall consist of the following members:
(1) Three members appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate; provided that two of
the three members appointed by the governor shall be
from a list of at least three nominees submitted
respectively by the:
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 15
IfOlllilllllllillilBllllilhKS

Page 16 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(A) Office of Hawaiian affairs; and
Center for cultural and technical interchange
between East and West, Inc.;
(2) One member appointed by the president of the senate;
(3) One member appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(4) The chairs of the respective senate and house
committees with jurisdiction over international
affairs or intergovernmental affairs, who shall serve
as ex-officio, non-voting members of the commission.
(d) The commission shall elect from among its members a
chairperson and vice chairperson.
(e) Members of the commission shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including
travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties.'
SECTION 8. Section 229-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-tl §229-3 [^] Initiating sistec-state relationships. The
[Hawa-i-i siotc-r—etatc committeo] commission shall evaluate and
develop recommendations for the initiation of all sister-state
or province partnerships and forward its
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiBiiininiiiniiiiiii

Page 17 S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
recommendation to the legislature. The legislature, if it so
chooses, shall implement the recommendation to initiate a
sister-state or province ’partnership by either
adopting a concurrent resolution or by enacting session law to
that effect."
SECTION 9. Section 229-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-f-1 §229-4 [-3-] Maintaining sister-state relationships. The
[Hawaii siotor-statc committoo] commission shall periodically
evaluate established sister-state [ro-lotionohipo] or province
partnerships and forward its recommendations on maintaining
sister-state [rclationgh-ips] or province partnerships to the
governor and to the legislature."
SECTION 10. Section 229-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t]§229-5 [^] Dissolving sister-state relationships. The
[Hawaii ■sister—otato committoo] commission may make a
recommendation to terminate a sister-state [-eeiat^reftsharp] or
province partnership it deems to be defunct, moribund, or not
beneficial and forward its recommendation to the legislature.
The legislature, if it so chooses, shall implement the
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx
iMiiiMiHiiiniiiHuiiiniii

Page 18 S.B. NO. 1578
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
recommendation to terminate a sister-state or
province partnership either by adopting a concurrent resolution
or by enacting session law to that effect."
SECTION 11. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the office of international affairs to develop an:
(1) Updated strategy for the State's international
engagement in the twenty-first century; and
(2) Analysis of potential investment and revenue
generation abroad.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes
of this Act.
SECTION 12. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the center for cultural and technical interchange
between East and West, Inc. to assist in the development and
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 18

Page 19 S.B. NO.
CD. 1
maintenance of the State’s international relationships,
programs, and partnerships.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university
of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 13. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 14. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2881 SB1578 CDl SMA.docx 19
illHilHBHMiniBiim

S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 3rd June , 2025
OT
O
b
o
b
day of

S.B. No. 1578, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
'resident of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
205

SB No. 1578, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives